Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB826.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 4 and 5 of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, are amended by adding clauses to read:Section 4. Definitions.--As used in this act unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:* * *(bb) The term "attendant care services" includes the 123456789101112131415161718192021 following:(1) Services that enable an eligible individual to live in the eligible individual's home and community and to carry out the functions of daily living, self-care and mobility which shall include:(i) Getting in and out of a bed, wheelchair or motor vehicle.(ii) Assistance with routine bodily functions, including:(A) Health maintenance activities.(B) Bathing and personal hygiene.(C) Dressing and grooming.(D) Feeding, including preparation and cleanup.(E) Critical cognitive tasks and tasks required to participate in community events, including managing transportation, handling tickets and communicating with others.(2) The services provided to an individual who is eligible for a home and community-based waiver under 42 U.S.C. § 1396n(c) (relating to compliance with State plan and payment provisions).(cc) The term "eligible individual" includes an individual with a disability who requires assistance to complete activities of daily living, self-care and mobility, including attendant care services.(dd) The term "personal care attendant" includes an individual who provides attendant care services to an eligible individual.Section 5. Unlawful Discriminatory Practices.--It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification, or in the case of a fraternal corporation or association, unless based upon membership in such association or corporation, or except where based upon 20250HB0826PN0853 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicable security regulations established by the United States or the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania:* * *(m) For any owner, lessee, proprietor, manager, superintendent, agent or employe of a public accommodation to not provide free admission to a personal care attendant whose attendance is necessary to enable an eligible individual to attend or tour an entertainment, educational, sporting or other event open to the public which charges admission, provided that the personal care attendant is not required to be provided a seat with a view of the event and may be directed to a seat and location in close proximity to the eligible individual where the eligible individual may be accommodated.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0826PN0853 - 3 - 1234567891011121314